Utah statutes.
20A-7-214.   Fiscal review -- Repeal, amendment, or resubmission.

(1)  No later 60 days after the date of an election in which the voters approve an initiative petition, the Governor's Office of Management and Budget shall:

(a)  for each initiative approved by the voters, prepare a final fiscal impact statement, using current financial information and containing the information required by Subsection 20A-7-202.5(2); and

(b)  deliver a copy of the final fiscal impact statement to:

(i)  the president of the Senate;

(ii)  the minority leader of the Senate;

(iii)  the speaker of the House of Representatives;

(iv)  the minority leader of the House of Representatives; and

(v)  the first five sponsors listed on the initiative application.

(2)  If the final fiscal impact statement exceeds the initial fiscal impact estimate by 25% or more, the Legislature shall review the final fiscal impact statement and may, in any legislative session following the election in which the voters approved the initiative petition:

(a)  repeal the law established by passage of the initiative;

(b)  amend the law established by passage of the initiative; or

(c)  pass a joint or concurrent resolution informing the voters that they may file an initiative petition to repeal the law enacted by the passage of the initiative.



Amended by Chapter 310, 2013 General Session

